Washington statutes.
RCW 19.138.320

Contract for sale of travel-related benefits—Cancellation—Process—Seven calendar days—Written disclosure required.

(1) A contract for the sale of travel-related benefits may be canceled at the option of the purchaser if the purchaser sends notice of the cancellation by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the seller of travel-related benefits at the address contained in the contract and if the notice is postmarked not later than midnight of the seventh calendar day following the day on which the contract is signed or any membership card and all membership materials are received by the purchaser, whichever is later. In addition to this cancellation right, a purchaser who signs a contract for the sale of travel-related benefits of any description from a seller of travel-related benefits without having received the written disclosures required in subsection (2) of this section has cancellation rights until seven calendar days after the receipt of the written disclosures. A purchaser must request cancellation of a contract by sending the notice of cancellation by certified mail, return receipt requested, postmarked not later than midnight of the seventh calendar day following the day on which the contract is signed, any membership card and all membership materials are received by the purchaser, or the day on which the disclosures were actually received, whichever is later, to the seller of travel-related benefits at the address contained in the contract. The purchaser may use the cancellation form prescribed in subsection (2) of this section, however, notice of cancellation is sufficient if it indicates the intention of the purchaser not to be bound by the contract. The purchaser's right of cancellation of a contract for the sale of travel-related benefits may not be waived.

(2) A contract for the sale of travel-related benefits must include the following statement in at least ten-point boldface type immediately before the space for the purchaser's signature:

"Purchaser's right to cancel: You may cancel this contract without any cancellation fee or other penalty, or stated reason for doing so, by sending notice of cancellation by certified mail, return receipt requested, to . . . (insert name of the seller of travel-related benefits) at the address indicated below. The notice must be postmarked by midnight of the seventh calendar day following the day on which this contract is signed by you or the day any membership card and all membership materials are received by you, whichever is later. The day on which the contract was signed is not included as a "calendar day," and if the seventh calendar day falls on a Sunday or legal holiday, then the right to cancel this contract expires on the day immediately following that Sunday or legal holiday.

TO CANCEL THIS CONTRACT, SEND A COPY OF THIS NOTICE OF CANCELLATION OR OTHER WRITTEN NOTICE OF CANCELLATION TO:

. . . . . . . . . . .

(Name of Seller)

. . . . . . . . . . .

(Address of Seller)

(Date)

I HEREBY CANCEL THIS CONTRACT

(Date)

. . . . . . . . . . .

(Purchaser's Signature)

. . . . . . . . . . .

(Printed Name)

. . . . . . . . . . .

(Purchaser's Address)"

(3) Within seven calendar days following timely receipt of notice of cancellation from the purchaser, the seller of travel-related benefits shall provide evidence that the contract has been canceled and return any money or other consideration paid by the purchaser. However, the seller of travel-related benefits may retain payments made for specific travel services utilized by the purchaser.

[ 2001 c 44 s 2.]